Maryland, session 2026, HB0999.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
2–203.
(a) There is a Class 9 limited distillery license.
(b) The limited distillery license may be issued only to a holder of a:
(1) Class D beer, wine, and liquor license where sales for both
on– and off–premises consumption are permitted for use on the premises for which the
Class D license was issued; or
(2) Class B beer, wine, and liquor license where sales for both
on– and off–premises consumption are permitted for use on the premises for which the
Class B license was issued.
(c) A holder of the limited distillery license:
(1) may establish and operate a plant in the State for distilling, rectifying,
and bottling brandy, rum, whiskey, alcohol, and neutral spirits [if the holder:
(i) maintains only one brand at any one time for each product of
brandy, rum, whiskey, alcohol, and neutral spirits that is distilled, rectified, and sold; and
– 1 –

Ch. 860 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) does not manufacture or rectify product of any other brand for
another entity];
(2) may acquire bulk alcoholic beverages from the holder of a distillery or
rectifying license in the State or from the holder of a nonresident dealer’s permit;
(3) after acquiring an individual storage permit, may store on the licensed
premises those products manufactured under the license;
(4) except as authorized under subsection (d)(1) of this section, may sell
and deliver those products manufactured under the license only to a licensed wholesaler in
the State or person authorized to acquire distilled spirits in another state and not to a
county dispensary;
(5) may sell the products manufactured under the license at retail in a
manner consistent with the underlying Class D or Class B license;
(6) may conduct guided tours of that portion of the licensed premises used
for the limited distillery operation; and
(7) may serve not more than three samples of products manufactured at
the licensed premises, with each sample consisting of not more than one–half ounce from a
single product, to persons who:
(i) have attained the legal drinking age;
(ii) participated in a guided tour; and
(iii) are present on that portion of the premises used for the limited
distillery operation.
(d) A holder of the limited distillery license may not:
(1) apply for or possess a wholesaler’s license, except for a Class 8 liquor
wholesaler’s license;
(2) sell bottles of the products manufactured at the Class 9 limited
distillery on that part of the premises used for the distillery operation;
(3) except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, distill, rectify, bottle,
or sell more than 100,000 gallons of brandy, rum, whiskey, alcohol, and neutral spirits each
calendar year;
(4) sell at retail on the premises of the Class D or Class B license, for
on–premises or off–premises consumption, more than 31,000 gallons of the products
manufactured under the license each calendar year; [and]
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 860
(5) MANUFACTURE OR RECTIFY MORE THAN 31,000 GALLONS OF
PRODUCT EACH CALENDAR YEAR FOR ANY OTHER BRAND OR ENTITY; AND
(6) own, operate, or be affiliated in any manner with another
manufacturer.
(e) To distill more than the gallonage specified in subsection (d)(3) of this section,
a holder of the limited distillery license shall divest itself of any Class D or Class B retail
license and obtain a Class 1 distillery license.
(f) A holder of the limited distillery license shall abide by all trade practice
restrictions applicable to distilleries.
(g) The annual license fee:
(1) shall be determined by the Executive Director; and
(2) may not exceed $500.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –